Utah statutes.
53A-3-504.   Traffic ordinances on school property -- Enforcement.

(1)  A local political subdivision in which real property is located that belongs to, or is controlled by, the State Board of Education, a local board of education, an area vocational center, or the Schools for the Deaf and the Blind may, at the request of the responsible board of education or institutional council, adopt ordinances for the control of vehicular traffic on that property.

(2)  A law enforcement officer whose jurisdiction includes the property in question may enforce an ordinance adopted under Subsection (1).

